Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 36 Durable Power of Attorney for Health Care

31-36-1 through 31-36-13.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 1101, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 31; Ga. L. 1999, p. 485, § 6; Ga. L. 1999, p. 485, § 7. The former chapter was incorporated into Chapter 32 of this title by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 2/HB 24, effective July 1, 2007; repealed by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 3/HB 24, effective July 1, 2007.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 3/HB 24 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2007.